Utah statutes.
59-7-112.   Installment sales.
(1)  Except as provided in Subsections (2) and (3), installment sales shall be
governed by Sections 453, 453A, and 453B, Internal Revenue Code.
(2)  Installment sales entered into prior to January 1, 1994, shall be
recognized as originally reported.
(3)  If a corporation is no longer required to file a Utah corporate return,
any taxes owed by that corporation on installment sales entered into by that
corporation shall accelerate and be due on the corporation's last return filed
in Utah.
